District of Columbia statutes.
31-3303.13

Alternative methods.

A health maintenance organization may use alternative methods to an affiliation period to address adverse selection provided that they are approved by the Commissioner prior to their use.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 313, 45 DCR 8433
1981 Ed., § 35-1043.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.
See notes to § 31-3301.01.